Washington statutes.
RCW 2.28.150

Implied powers—Proceeding when mode not prescribed.

When jurisdiction is, by the Constitution of this state, or by statute, conferred on a court or judicial officer all the means to carry it into effect are also given; and in the exercise of the jurisdiction, if the course of proceeding is not specifically pointed out by statute, any suitable process or mode of proceeding may be adopted which may appear most conformable to the spirit of the laws.

[ 1955 c 38 s 15; 1891 c 54 s 12; RRS s 69.]